Utah statutes.
23-23-8.   Compensation for damage -- Claims.
A landowner participating in a cooperative wildlife management unit who incurs
damages caused by a hunter on his or her land may submit a claim and receive
compensation for the claim from money received for cooperative wildlife
management unit authorization or permit fees collected by the landowner
association.
(1)  These claims shall:
(a)  be paid first and have priority over all other obligations of the
landowner association;
(b)  be reviewed, investigated, and paid by the landowner association; and
(c)  not exceed annual revenues of a unit.
(2)  A landowner participating in a cooperative wildlife management unit who
incurs damages caused by a hunter on his or her land may not hold the state
liable for compensation.
